Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1005
Nebraska Safety Center; operation; funding.

(1) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may accept and administer, in accordance with proper financial procedures at the University of Nebraska at Kearney, gifts, grants, tuition, fees, and private funds to assist in the operation of the center.

(2) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may request an appropriation from the General Fund to assist in the operation of the center to promote the purposes of sections 85-1001 to 85-1007.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 31;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 58.
July 1, 2026